Florida, session 2026, HB1405.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Notwithstanding the repeal of section 937.041,
Florida Statutes, in section 13 of chapter 2020-3, Laws of
Florida, section 937.041, Florida Statutes, is revived,
readopted, and amended to read:
937.041 Missing persons with special needs statewide
project.—
(1) There is created a statewide project, to be known as
"Project Leo," through the centers a center for autism and
related disabilities established under s. 1004.55. Each center
that opts to join the project shall distribute personal devices
to aid search-and-rescue efforts for persons with special needs
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1405 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 1405 2026 Legislature
in the case of elopement.
(2) Participants for the project shall be selected based
on criteria developed by the respective center for autism and
related disabilities based on the specific needs of the
respective each center's service area counties prescribed under
s. 1004.55. Criteria for participation in the project must
include, at a minimum, the person's risk of elopement. The
qualifying participants shall be selected on a first-come,
first-served basis by the respective centers to the extent of
available funding within their existing resources. The project
must be voluntary and free of charge to participants.
(3) Under the project, personal devices to aid search-and-
rescue efforts shall be provided by the respective center to the
sheriff's offices of the participating counties. The devices
shall be distributed to project participants by the county
sheriff's offices in conjunction with the respective center. The
respective center shall fund any costs associated with
monitoring the devices.
(4) The project shall operate to the extent of available
funding within the respective center's existing resources.
(5) This section expires June 30, 2019.
Section 2. For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of
$250,000 in nonrecurring funds is appropriated from the General
Revenue Fund to the Center for Autism and Related Disabilities
at the University of Florida, the sum of $250,000 in
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1405 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 1405 2026 Legislature
nonrecurring funds is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund
to the Center for Autism and Related Disabilities at Florida
Atlantic University, the sum of $250,000 in nonrecurring funds
is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Center for
Autism and Related Disabilities at the University of South
Florida, and the sum of $250,000 in nonrecurring funds is
appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the Center for
Autism and Related Disabilities at Florida State University. The
funds provided to each center shall be used solely for the
purchase of personal devices to aid search-and-rescue efforts
for persons with special needs in the case of elopement.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1405 -00-er